lib/vendor/dicts/en_EN.aff
FLAG num
SFX 4310 Y 1
SFX 4310 0 aller .
SFX 3699 Y 1
SFX 3699 0 tables .
SFX 963 Y 1
SFX 963 0 holders .
SFX 1692 Y 1
SFX 1692 0 ours .
SFX 3066 Y 1
SFX 3066 0 trings .
SFX 3137 Y 1
SFX 3137 0 spaces .
SFX 388 Y 1
SFX 388 0 outs .
SFX 1575 Y 1
SFX 1575 0 leen's .
SFX 4163 Y 1
SFX 4163 0 feet .
SFX 4870 Y 1
SFX 4870 0 ngly .
SFX 1035 Y 1
SFX 1035 0 ann's .
SFX 4488 Y 1
SFX 4488 0 tility's .
SFX 3760 Y 1
SFX 3760 0 script .
SFX 674 Y 1
SFX 674 0 alizing .
SFX 3863 Y 1
SFX 3863 0 orising .
SFX 1476 Y 1
SFX 1476 0 gings .
SFX 1651 Y 1
SFX 1651 0 tide .
SFX 3116 Y 1
SFX 3116 0 taining .
SFX 3190 Y 1
SFX 3190 0 rel's .
SFX 3559 Y 1
SFX 3559 0 aded .
SFX 4726 Y 1
SFX 4726 0 rail's .
SFX 1507 Y 1
SFX 1507 0 ades .
SFX 3767 Y 1
SFX 3767 0 sacks .
SFX 2440 Y 1
SFX 2440 0 liner's .
SFX 1060 Y 1
SFX 1060 0 ow's .
SFX 2319 Y 1
SFX 2319 0 tile .
SFX 1580 Y 1
SFX 1580 0 izable .
SFX 1523 Y 1
SFX 1523 0 tily .
SFX 4487 Y 1
SFX 4487 0 tina .
SFX 3084 Y 1
SFX 3084 0 tine .
SFX 48 Y 1
SFX 48 0 ting .
SFX 1947 Y 1
SFX 1947 0 ination .
SFX 1838 Y 1
SFX 1838 0 traps .
SFX 4485 Y 1
SFX 4485 0 tinent .
SFX 3832 Y 1
SFX 3832 0 plying .
SFX 3091 Y 1
SFX 3091 0 tha .
SFX 2324 Y 1
SFX 2324 0 the .
SFX 279 Y 1
SFX 279 0 ths .
SFX 3088 Y 1
SFX 3088 0 thy .
SFX 530 Y 1
SFX 530 0 ni's .
SFX 878 Y 1
SFX 878 0 tive .
SFX 634 Y 1
SFX 634 0 tle .
SFX 568 Y 1
SFX 568 0 tly .
SFX 4623 Y 1
SFX 4623 0 sensitive .
SFX 2280 Y 1
SFX 2280 0 yl's .
SFX 4101 Y 1
SFX 4101 0 ico's .
SFX 1599 Y 1
SFX 1599 0 ests .
SFX 4325 Y 1
SFX 4325 0 aciously .
SFX 3662 Y 1
SFX 3662 0 tize .
SFX 3242 Y 1
SFX 3242 0 orized .
SFX 3241 Y 1
SFX 3241 0 orizes .
SFX 3802 Y 1
SFX 3802 0 rial .
SFX 2713 Y 1
SFX 2713 0 rian .
SFX 793 Y 1
SFX 793 0 dene .
SFX 1616 Y 1
SFX 1616 0 dens .
SFX 2118 Y 1
SFX 2118 0 rick .
SFX 4462 Y 1
SFX 4462 0 tra .
SFX 2733 Y 1
SFX 2733 0 places .
SFX 3181 Y 1
SFX 3181 0 rics .
SFX 1280 Y 1
SFX 1280 0 try .
SFX 3504 Y 1
SFX 3504 0 cription .
SFX 2117 Y 1
SFX 2117 0 ried .
SFX 704 Y 1
SFX 704 0 tta .
SFX 344 Y 1
SFX 344 0 tte .
SFX 1130 Y 1
SFX 1130 0 rier .
SFX 141 Y 1
SFX 141 0 ries .
SFX 3844 Y 1
SFX 3844 0 pecting .
SFX 364 Y 1
SFX 364 0 ders .
SFX 1029 Y 1
SFX 1029 0 bound .
SFX 2434 Y 1
SFX 2434 0 load's .
SFX 3696 Y 1
SFX 3696 0 taker .
SFX 3114 Y 1
SFX 3114 0 takes .
SFX 4385 Y 1
SFX 4385 0 usness .
SFX 2347 Y 1
SFX 2347 0 set's .
SFX 4758 Y 1
SFX 4758 0 pective .
SFX 869 Y 1
SFX 869 0 ana's .
SFX 4282 Y 1
SFX 4282 0 beat .
SFX 658 Y 1
SFX 658 0 ting's .
SFX 3702 Y 1
SFX 3702 0 sure's .
SFX 567 Y 1
SFX 567 0 uring .
SFX 1676 Y 1
SFX 1676 0 rise .
SFX 4679 Y 1
SFX 4679 0 rish .
SFX 3953 Y 1
SFX 3953 0 mentally .
SFX 4314 Y 1
SFX 4314 0 aker's .
SFX 4675 Y 1
SFX 4675 0 rium .
SFX 196 Y 1
SFX 196 0 lessness's .
SFX 3008 Y 1
SFX 3008 0 -first .
SFX 2088 Y 1
SFX 2088 0 suits .
SFX 3521 Y 1
SFX 3521 0 caster .
SFX 2292 Y 1
SFX 2292 0 v's .
SFX 2584 Y 1
SFX 2584 0 -free .
SFX 3073 Y 1
SFX 3073 0 tizing .
SFX 3287 Y 1
SFX 3287 0 mouth's .
SFX 4550 Y 1
SFX 4550 0 streams .
SFX 3118 Y 1
SFX 3118 0 sville's .
SFX 2123 Y 1
SFX 2123 0 ral's .
SFX 4468 Y 1
SFX 4468 0 tooth .
SFX 1441 Y 1
SFX 1441 0 iums .
SFX 4747 Y 1
SFX 4747 0 pile .
SFX 3226 Y 1
SFX 3226 0 pily .
SFX 4464 Y 1
SFX 4464 0 tory's .
SFX 109 Y 1
SFX 109 0 ping .
SFX 1447 Y 1
SFX 1447 0 ishing .
SFX 1540 Y 1
SFX 1540 0 pins .
SFX 697 Y 1
SFX 697 0 alities .
SFX 2133 Y 1
SFX 2133 0 pipe .
SFX 1166 Y 1
SFX 1166 0 fuller .
SFX 670 Y 1
SFX 670 0 gle .
SFX 1975 Y 1
SFX 1975 0 gly .
SFX 641 Y 1
SFX 641 0 ioning .
SFX 2162 Y 1
SFX 2162 0 ncy's .
SFX 2330 Y 1
SFX 2330 0 tances .
SFX 3548 Y 1
SFX 3548 0 antry's .
SFX 4507 Y 1
SFX 4507 0 tha's .
SFX 223 Y 1
SFX 223 0 ine's .
SFX 943 Y 1
SFX 943 0 owed .
SFX 2738 Y 1
SFX 2738 0 ower .
SFX 2646 Y 1
SFX 2646 0 tide's .
SFX 2853 Y 1
SFX 2853 0 imeter .
SFX 4413 Y 1
SFX 4413 0 ularities .
SFX 102 Y 1
SFX 102 0 ations .
SFX 1767 Y 1
SFX 1767 0 flies .
SFX 2154 Y 1
SFX 2154 0 nian .
SFX 4912 Y 1
SFX 4912 0 mond's .
SFX 1423 Y 1
SFX 1423 0 nier .
SFX 708 Y 1
SFX 708 0 nies .
SFX 599 Y 1
SFX 599 0 alized .
SFX 4372 Y 1
SFX 4372 0 vened .
SFX 2261 Y 1
SFX 2261 0 alizer .
SFX 675 Y 1
SFX 675 0 alizes .
SFX 3478 Y 1
SFX 3478 0 elessness's .
SFX 2544 Y 1
SFX 2544 0 chings .
SFX 3415 Y 1
SFX 3415 0 ground's .
SFX 3650 Y 1
SFX 3650 0 treams .
SFX 3975 Y 1
SFX 3975 0 loaded .
SFX 4455 Y 1
SFX 4455 0 tractions .
SFX 5000 Y 1
SFX 5000 0 lard's .
SFX 2555 Y 1
SFX 2555 0 au's .
SFX 1044 Y 1
SFX 1044 0 ware's .
SFX 1510 Y 1
SFX 1510 0 -outs .
SFX 106 Y 1
SFX 106 0 i's .
SFX 3271 Y 1
SFX 3271 0 nise .
SFX 1899 Y 1
SFX 1899 0 nish .
SFX 2774 Y 1
SFX 2774 0 nism .
SFX 3269 Y 1
SFX 3269 0 nist .
SFX 4076 Y 1
SFX 4076 0 inda's .
SFX 942 Y 1
SFX 942 0 owing .
SFX 143 Y 1
SFX 143 0 isations .
SFX 1338 Y 1
SFX 1338 0 ections .
SFX 1552 Y 1
SFX 1552 0 off's .
SFX 1987 Y 1
SFX 1987 0 erated .
SFX 1986 Y 1
SFX 1986 0 erates .
SFX 4000 Y 1
SFX 4000 0 licated .
SFX 3999 Y 1
SFX 3999 0 licates .
SFX 4329 Y 1
SFX 4329 0 ableness' .
SFX 4978 Y 1
SFX 4978 0 life .
SFX 343 Y 1
SFX 343 0 tte's .
SFX 4977 Y 1
SFX 4977 0 lift .
SFX 246 Y 1
SFX 246 0 lessnesses .
SFX 165 Y 1
SFX 165 0 fully .
SFX 1275 Y 1
SFX 1275 0 ved .
SFX 3606 Y 1
SFX 3606 0 ven .
SFX 1189 Y 1
SFX 1189 0 ver .
SFX 1188 Y 1
SFX 1188 0 ves .
SFX 3939 Y 1
SFX 3939 0 mouthed .
SFX 4234 Y 1
SFX 4234 0 dated .
SFX 2604 Y 1
SFX 2604 0 vin .
SFX 3473 Y 1
SFX 3473 0 enced .
SFX 1724 Y 1
SFX 1724 0 lina .
SFX 219 Y 1
SFX 219 0 line .
SFX 581 Y 1
SFX 581 0 ences .
SFX 46 Y 1
SFX 46 0 ling .
SFX 2438 Y 1
SFX 2438 0 lins .
SFX 3320 Y 1
SFX 3320 0 lips .
SFX 4921 Y 1
SFX 4921 0 mised .
SFX 933 Y 1
SFX 933 0 skin's .
SFX 1847 Y 1
SFX 1847 0 tance's .
SFX 1434 Y 1
SFX 1434 0 lity .
SFX 3385 Y 1
SFX 3385 0 icides .
SFX 3860 Y 1
SFX 3860 0 orship's .
SFX 2484 Y 1
SFX 2484 0 ialities .
SFX 3370 Y 1
SFX 3370 0 imated .
SFX 3369 Y 1
SFX 3369 0 imates .
SFX 2994 Y 1
SFX 2994 0 -ninefold .
SFX 1568 Y 1
SFX 1568 0 lize .
SFX 1377 Y 1
SFX 1377 0 swoman's .
SFX 3020 Y 1
SFX 3020 0 worthiness's .
SFX 3214 Y 1
SFX 3214 0 powers .
SFX 1972 Y 1
SFX 1972 0 haven .
SFX 926 Y 1
SFX 926 0 ular .
SFX 4410 Y 1
SFX 4410 0 ulas .
SFX 1788 Y 1
SFX 1788 0 diness .
SFX 777 Y 1
SFX 777 0 my's .
SFX 2066 Y 1
SFX 2066 0 ules .
SFX 3353 Y 1
SFX 3353 0 issa's .
SFX 827 Y 1
SFX 827 0 ah's .
SFX 2409 Y 1
SFX 2409 0 nation .
SFX 1357 Y 1
SFX 1357 0 waters .
SFX 3497 Y 1
SFX 3497 0 cuts .
SFX 273 Y 1
SFX 273 0 land's .
SFX 56 Y 1
SFX 56 0 iness .
SFX 1316 Y 1
SFX 1316 0 keeper's .
SFX 2744 Y 1
SFX 2744 0 osing .
SFX 2525 Y 1
SFX 2525 0 ert's .
SFX 4405 Y 1
SFX 4405 0 ulus .
SFX 1532 Y 1
SFX 1532 0 smith .
SFX 204 Y 1
SFX 204 0 ial .
SFX 110 Y 1
SFX 110 0 ian .
SFX 1591 Y 1
SFX 1591 0 ias .
SFX 1327 Y 1
SFX 1327 0 ica .
SFX 747 Y 1
SFX 747 0 ice .
SFX 1746 Y 1
SFX 1746 0 ick .
SFX 3383 Y 1
SFX 3383 0 ico .
SFX 254 Y 1
SFX 254 0 ics .
SFX 370 Y 1
SFX 370 0 ied .
SFX 34 Y 1
SFX 34 0 ier .
SFX 37 Y 1
SFX 37 0 ies .
SFX 2373 Y 1
SFX 2373 0 post's .
SFX 3436 Y 1
SFX 3436 0 formed .
SFX 2859 Y 1
SFX 2859 0 ign .
SFX 4188 Y 1
SFX 4188 0 erness's .
SFX 700 Y 1
SFX 700 0 ville's .
SFX 2206 Y 1
SFX 2206 0 iable .
SFX 4084 Y 1
SFX 4084 0 ika .
SFX 2843 Y 1
SFX 2843 0 itation .
SFX 759 Y 1
SFX 759 0 bling .
SFX 3787 Y 1
SFX 3787 0 rolling .
SFX 2472 Y 1
SFX 2472 0 ime .
SFX 3366 Y 1
SFX 3366 0 ims .
SFX 717 Y 1
SFX 717 0 hill .
SFX 55 Y 1
SFX 55 0 ion .
SFX 2462 Y 1
SFX 2462 0 ior .
SFX 2460 Y 1
SFX 2460 0 ios .
SFX 4132 Y 1
SFX 4132 0 hine .
SFX 479 Y 1
SFX 479 0 hing .
SFX 1880 Y 1
SFX 1880 0 plane .
SFX 2732 Y 1
SFX 2732 0 position .
SFX 235 Y 1
SFX 235 0 hips .
SFX 87 Y 1
SFX 87 0 ise .
SFX 115 Y 1
SFX 115 0 ish .
SFX 47 Y 1
SFX 47 0 ism .
SFX 59 Y 1
SFX 59 0 ist .
SFX 3406 Y 1
SFX 3406 0 hire .
SFX 2887 Y 1
SFX 2887 0 goers .
SFX 904 Y 1
SFX 904 0 ium .
SFX 849 Y 1
SFX 849 0 ius .
SFX 860 Y 1
SFX 860 0 erers .
SFX 2549 Y 1
SFX 2549 0 bi's .
SFX 1409 Y 1
SFX 1409 0 plate .
SFX 2216 Y 1
SFX 2216 0 gie's .
SFX 2129 Y 1
SFX 2129 0 plates .
SFX 2235 Y 1
SFX 2235 0 ele's .
SFX 1900 Y 1
SFX 1900 0 nia's .
