lib/vendor/dicts/en_EN.dic
Marie/1035,1036,1635
Shir/1,49,107,219,294,304,346,573,1575,1576,2817,2818
Tabbi/3091,4507
cannon/2,3,4,694,724,1507,1508,1628,3539,3540,3558,3559
den/1,2,18,26,34,37,48,57,63,97,151,159,204,280,370,395,540,562,668,746,1051,1279,1369,1456,1754,1836,2075,2076,2077,2206,2317,2318,2618,2619,2689,2963,2964,3077,3083,3084,3112,3113,3153,3235,3236,3366,3372,3577,3730,3731,3753,3754,3857,3858,4587,4615
hos/3,4,8,16,21,26,34,48,57,63,97,285,562,568,746,1264,1370,1528,1849,2315,2319,2641,2664,3668,3669,4488,4489
jet/1,2,48,57,157,261,301,450,506,658,892,1407,1538,1722,2439,2440,3670,4442
log/1,2,8,16,18,21,34,36,43,55,60,62,68,94,131,133,135,148,182,236,254,276,291,332,353,362,402,499,512,564,652,721,1077,1476,1477,2204,2482,2483,2868,2869,3394,3787,4112,4114
mono/1,2,307,460,720,1564,1718,2130,2131,2211,2375,2500,3220,3613,3712,3889,4228,4726
neap/2,3,4,1651
orange/1,2,18,103,128,141,1507,1508,1628
organ/1,2,43,47,59,65,67,73,79,80,85,86,87,91,92,95,98,126,134,139,143,148,166,244,254,257,265,271,274,295,307,460,650,689,690,720,756,1320,1580,1583,2048,2452,3575,4580,4581
pan/1,2,4,8,16,21,26,43,48,57,63,97,131,135,151,159,193,208,218,225,254,301,337,363,364,380,404,483,511,512,562,643,659,754,804,832,861,934,1244,1246,1259,1280,1341,1342,1345,1423,1618,1629,1649,1764,2072,2080,2132,2271,2272,2319,2588,3090,4102,4103,4210,4211,4231,4489,4502
pen/1,2,6,25,26,69,78,90,92,97,112,151,159,178,191,216,264,283,292,333,365,385,415,433,458,533,599,631,638,639,663,674,675,676,678,696,698,699,708,737,779,797,826,871,896,980,1000,1137,1143,1144,1291,1292,1305,1311,1387,1855,2153,2568,2569,2770,2771,3140,3729,4904
per/75,82,97,103,231,237,290,298,373,453,461,467,472,493,568,602,833,961,1192,1238,1458,1827,1829,1830,1840,1848,1913,1949,2086,2313,2420,2470,2473,2509,2608,2663,2852,2853,2854,3116,3435,3436,3598,3618,3945,3946,3947,4080,4255,4260,4367,4485,4755,4788,4789,4790,4917,4918
pet/1,2,9,14,28,48,57,82,119,127,137,152,156,157,301,354,355,414,423,450,506,575,630,742,769,979,1047,1131,1523,1627,1792,1937,2013,2014,2187,2456,3075,3077,3190,3191,3787,4658
ran/2,6,26,48,57,82,97,106,119,127,131,135,178,201,208,216,229,255,276,283,298,307,362,373,384,392,402,461,472,487,493,549,597,626,644,645,692,720,795,1251,1344,1371,1489,1788,1976,2215,2242,2544,2696,3767
regret/48,57,108,165,177,205,635
rent/1,2,3,4,9,12,14,28,137,355,2584,4310
rig/1,2,100,105,118,131,135,276,362,402,713,1300,1415,1476,1477,1692,1956,1957,1958,2380,2381,2478,2861,4782
sick/2,3,4,5,9,10,11,17,37,38,46,52,53,61,68,83,88,115,125,153,221,224,232,236,238,269,270,296,297,332,388,389,457,464,469,489,509,535,598,647,1715,1803,1992,2441,4203
splay/2,3,4,1979,3437,3438,4163
spot/1,2,48,50,57,82,119,127,157,164,172,196,246,450,506,639,658,663,769,779,879,1047,1277,1518,1523,1639,1641,1824,1825,1826,1828,2293,2810,2813,2814,3038,3047
stock/1,2,3,4,9,12,14,18,29,32,34,36,56,59,67,72,73,74,129,464,489,509,922,940,963,1043,1110,1163,1299,1406,1471,1507,1508,1628,2332,3558,3559,4747
subs/59,67,145,171,197,352,548,1247,1248,1302,1338,1375,1525,1526,1589,1658,1847,1959,2300,2330,2378,2613,2614,2615,3066,3649,3666,3667,4473,4474,4475,4476,4477,4769
the/4,8,16,18,27,47,59,65,67,71,73,79,209,230,231,237,263,280,290,291,334,608,638,661,735,737,896,900,937,1000,1063,1136,1185,1306,1431,1516,1561,1710,1711,1815,1941,2002,2459,2760,3110,3141,3240,3241,3242,3243,3244,3733,3793,3861,3862,3863,3864,3865,3866,3956,4066,4288,4289,4783
type/1,2,6,7,13,50,96,305,335,382,1294,1323,1463,1464,1465,1467,1494,1588,1701,1816,1817,1952,1980,2023,2145,2248,2283,2346,2591,2904,2905,3257,3578,3759,3760,3882,4346,4347,4348,4614,4824,4825
will/2,3,4,9,12,18,29,37,51,108,165,177,240,351,387,611,682,853,942,943,1060,1452,2371,2469,2738,3214,3215,4770,4771
work/1,2,3,4,9,12,14,29,32,35,69,78,90,112,186,206,299,319,332,349,371,376,388,400,407,464,474,489,509,529,564,635,652,721,876,928,953,1027,1065,1143,1144,1212,1213,1222,1252,1253,1311,1411,1432,1881,2095,2103,2207,2342,2434,2485,2681,2733,2876,3125,3126,3137,3449,3699,3746,3835,3959,4165,4559,4610
